New York, session 2025-2026, S10451.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The social services law is amended by adding a new section 2 422-d to read as follows: 3 § 422-d. Child abuse and neglect; access to court-appointed attorneys 4 in schools. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law to the 5 contrary, each board of education and school district shall provide any 6 child involved in an investigation or proceeding relating to allegations 7 of abuse and/or neglect with reasonable access to their court appointed 8 attorneys. The provisions of this section shall not be deemed to require 9 that such access be provided for matters solely involving adoption or 10 custody determinations. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15668-02-6